src/fst/stems/prepositions.lexc
!! # Traveller Norwegian prepositions


LEXICON pr
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adds the tag  **+Pr**
+Pr: # ;

LEXICON Prepositions
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** contains the prepositions (10 so far)

andri pr "i" ; 
ann pr "i" ;
av pr "av" ; ! ta
fann pr "fra" ; 
før pr ;
førtus pr "før" ;
i pr "i" ;
pali pr "etter, bak, baki; tilbake" ;
pre pr "på, hos" ;
te pr "til" ;
tellan pr "under" ;
to pr "til" ;
